Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.19, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Vacancy filled at general election. When a vacancy occurs more than 150 days before the next state general election, and the legislature will not be in session before the final canvass of the state general election returns, the vacancy shall be filled at the next state general election.new text begin When practicable, the filing period for the vacancy must be concurrent with the filing period for the general election filing period provided in section 204B.09. If not possible, the filing period for the vacancy must be a minimum of seven days and a maximum of ten days, excluding holidays.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.19, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Special election when legislature will be in session. Except for vacancies in the legislature which occur at any time between the last day of session in an odd-numbered year and the deleted text begin 40thdeleted text end new text begin 50thnew text end day prior to the opening day of session in the succeeding even-numbered year, when a vacancy occurs and the legislature will be in session so that the individual elected as provided by this section could take office and exercise the duties of the office immediately upon election, the governor shall issue within five days after the vacancy occurs a writ calling for a special election. new text begin The filing period for the vacancy must be a minimum of seven days and a maximum of ten days, excluding holidays. new text end The special election shall be held as soon as possible, consistent with the notice requirements of section 204D.22, subdivision 3, but in no event more than deleted text begin 35deleted text end new text begin 45new text end days after the issuance of the writ. A special election must not be held during the four days before or the four days after a holiday as defined in section 645.44, subdivision 5. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.19, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Special election at other times. When a vacancy occurs at a time other than those described in subdivisions 1 and 2 the governor shall issue a writ, calling for a special election to be held so that the individual elected may take office at the opening of the next session of the legislature, or at the reconvening of a session of the legislature.new text begin The filing period for the vacancy must be a minimum of seven days and a maximum of ten days, excluding holidays.new text end Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day following final enactment and applies to vacancies in legislative offices that occur on or after that date. new text end